District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0683.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Modification No. 4 to Multiyear Contract No. CW91301 with Thales
DIS USA, Inc. Approval and Payment Authorization Emergency Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 451(c)(3) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act,
approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 803; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.51(c)(3)), the Council
approves Modification No. 4 to multiyear Contract No. CW91301 with Thales DIS USA, Inc., in
the not-to-exceed amount of $13,707,400. The period of performance is from July 1, 2023,
through June 30, 2030.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the Home Rule Act of the District of Columbia, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat.
788; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2